Idaho, session 2025, H0142.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-450B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-450B. INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDITS OF LOCAL GOVERNMENTAL ENTITIES
-- FILING REQUIREMENTS.
(1)(a) The requirements set forth in this section are minimum audit
requirements for all local governmental entities, and include, without
limitation, all cities, counties, authorities and districts orga-
nized as separate legal and reporting entities under Idaho law, and
include the councils, commissions and boards as appointed or elected
and charged with fiscal management responsibilities of the local gov-
ernmental entity.
(b) Audits under these requirements are to be performed by independent
auditors in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing
standards, as defined by the United States general accountability of-
fice. The auditor shall be employed on written contract.
(c) The entity's governing body shall be required to include in its an-
nual budget all necessary expenses for carrying out the provisions of
this section.
(d) The entity shall file one (1) copy of each completed audit report
with the legislative services office within nine (9) months after the
end of the audit period.
(2) The minimum requirements for any audit performed under the provi-
sions of this section are:
(a) The governing body of a local governmental entity whose annual ex-
penditures from all sources exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) shall cause a full
and complete audit of its financial statements to be made each fiscal
year.
(b) The governing body of a local governmental entity whose annual ex-
penditures from all sources exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars
($150,000) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), but do not exceed
two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) three hundred thousand
dollars ($300,000) in the current year, shall have an annual audit or
may elect to have its financial statements audited on a biennial basis.
The first year that expenditures exceed one hundred fifty thousand dol-
lars ($150,000) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) is the first


year of the biennial audit period. The local governmental entity may
continue the biennial audit cycle in subsequent years as long as the
entity's annual expenditures during the first year of the biennial au-
dit period do not exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). In the event that annual ex-
penditures exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) three
hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in the current year following a
year in which a biennial audit was completed, the local governmental
entity shall complete an annual audit. In the event that annual expen-
ditures in the current year do not exceed one hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($150,000) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) following a
year in which an annual or biennial audit was completed, the local gov-
ernmental entity has no minimum audit requirement.
(c) The governing body of a local governmental entity whose annual
expenditures from all sources do not exceed one hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($150,000) two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) has no mini-
mum audit requirements under this section.
(d) Federal audit requirements applicable because of expenditure of
federal assistance supersede the minimum audit requirements provided
in this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.